Utah statutes.
78B-15-802.   Requirements of petition.

(1)  The intended parents and the prospective gestational mother may file a petition in the district tribunal to validate a gestational agreement.

(2)  A petition to validate a gestational agreement may not be maintained unless either the mother or intended parents have been residents of this state for at least 90 days.

(3)  The prospective gestational mother's husband, if she is married, must join in the petition.

(4)  A copy of the gestational agreement must be attached to the petition.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

